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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC B0100/13 Short in D Squib Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The D squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly, spiral cable and steering wheel pad.
It causes the airbag to deploy when the airbag deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−2.
DTC B0100/13 is recorded when a short is detected in the D squib circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B0100/13

SShort circuit betweenD+wireharnessandD − wirehar-
ness of squib
SDsquibmalfunction
SSpiral cablemalfunction
SAirbagsensorassemblymalfunction

SSteeringwheelpad (Dsquib)
SSpiral cable
SAirbagsensorassembly
SWireharness
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI−549)

2 Check D squib circuit.

PREPARATION:
Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the con-
nector (on the airbag sensor assembly side) between the airbag
sensor assembly and the spiral cable.
(See page DI−447)

CHECK:
For the connector (on the spiral cable side) between the spiral
cable and the steering wheel pad, measure the resistance be-
tweenD+andD −.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orHigher

NG Go to step 5.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Using a service wire, connect D+ and D− of the connector

(on the spiral cable side) between the spiral cable and the
steering wheel pad.

(c) Connect negative (−) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(b) Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI−447)
(c) Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-

conds.
(d) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(e) Check DTC.

(See page DI−447)
OK:

DTCB0 100/13 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB0 100/13maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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4 Check D squib.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect negative (−) terminal cable from the battery,

and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the steering wheel pad connector.
(d) Connect negative (−) terminal cable to the battery, and

wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-

conds.
(b) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(c) Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI−447)
(d) Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-

conds.
(e) Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20

seconds.
(f)CheckDTC.

(See page DI−447)
OK:

DTCB0 100/13 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB0 100/13maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace steering wheel pad.

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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5 Check spiral cable.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the connector between the airbag sensor as-

sembly and the spiral cable.
(b) Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the

spiral cable connector on the airbag sensor assembly
side. (See page DI−447)

CHECK:
For the connector (on the spiral cable side) between the spiral
cable and the steering wheel pad, measure the resistance be-
tween D+ and D−.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or Higher

NG Repair or replace spiral cable.

OK

6 Check column wire harness.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the connector between the column wire har-

ness and airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the

column wire harness connector on the airbag sensor as-
sembly side. (See page DI−447)

CHECK:
For the connector (on the column wire harness) between the
column wire harness and spiral cable, measure the resistance
between D+ and D−.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� or Higher

NG Repair or replace column wire harness.

OK
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7 Check harness between airbag sensor assembly and column wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the con-
nector (on the airbag sensor assembly side) between the airbag
sensor assem bly and t he c olum n wir e har ness. ( See page
DI−447)
CHECK:
For the connector (on the column wire harness side) between
the airbag sensor assembly and the column wire harness, mea-
sure the resistance between D+ and D−.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� or Higher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector be-
tween airbag sensor assembly and column wire
harness.

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.


